Hawaii statutes.
§322-23 Notice to owners to improve.
The comptroller upon the receipt of the notice shall cause a copy of the same
to be served in the manner prescribed in section 322-24 upon the owner or
occupant of the land. The comptroller shall also notify each owner or occupant
that a detailed statement and map or plan of the proposed improvement is on
file in the comptroller's office accessible to the owner or occupant. The
comptroller shall at the same time and in the same manner serve notice that, in
case of failure to begin work upon the improvements within twenty days, or such
further time in special cases as to the comptroller may seem reasonable, and to
complete such work within a reasonable time in the notice designated, such work
or so much thereof as may remain undone will be done by the State at the cost
of the lands benefited thereby. [L 1896, c 61, §2; am L 1911, c 112, §2; am L
1915, c 190, §2; RL 1925, §977; RL 1935, §1327; RL 1945, §2718; RL 1955,
§47-22; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §12; HRS §322-23; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

"Owner" defined, sufficiency of notice. 22 H. 327,
335, 342.

Lien attaches, when. 31 H. 446.

Sufficiency of notice, waiver. 33 H. 199.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next